Nebraska, session 109, LB1101A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1101A LB1101A
2026 2026
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $-0- from the Judges
Expense Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $7,500 from the Judges Expense Fund
for FY2026-27 to the Public Employees Retirement Board, for Program 41,
to aid in carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 1101, One
Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
for state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this
section.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-